Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-618.03
Electric bicycle, defined.

Electric bicycle means a Class I electric bicycle, a Class II electric bicycle, and a Class III electric bicycle.

Laws 2023, LB138, § 41.